Hawaii statutes.
§150A-8 Transporting in State. Flora
and fauna specified by rules and regulations of the department shall not be
moved from one island to another island within the State or from one locality
to another on the same island except by a permit issued by the department. [L
1973, c 69, pt of §1; am L 1974, c 232, §3; am L 1977, c 114, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next